Utah statutes.
4-32-12.   Unauthorized use or possession of official devices, labels,
marks, or certificates -- False statements, misrepresentations, and trade
secrets.
(1)  No person shall cast, print, lithograph, or make any device or label
containing or bearing any official mark or simulation of  a mark, or any form
or simulation of an official certificate unless authorized by the
commissioner.
(2)  No person shall:
(a)  forge any official device, mark, or certificate;
(b)  use any official device, mark, or certificate without the authorization
of the commissioner;
(c)  alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or
certificate;
(d)  fail to use, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or
certificate as required by this chapter;
(e)  knowingly possess any of the following, if it bears any unauthorized,
counterfeit, simulated, forged, or altered official mark:
(i)  an official device;
(ii)  a counterfeit, simulated, forged, or altered official certificate;
(iii)  a device;
(iv)  a label;
(v)  a carcass of any animal, including poultry; or
(vi)  a part or product of any animal,  including poultry;
(f)  knowingly make any false statement in any shipper's certificate, or
nonofficial or official certificate;
(g)  knowingly represent that any livestock or poultry product has been
inspected and approved, or exempted, under this chapter when, in fact, it has
not; or
(h)  use to his advantage or reveal any information acquired under the
authority of this chapter relating to any matter entitled to protection as a
trade secret unless the information is:
(i)  revealed to an authorized government representative; or
(ii)  ordered by a court in a judicial proceeding.
